Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-198
Civil penalty; manner of collection; attorney's fees and costs; disposition.

If a civil penalty is imposed pursuant to section 38-196, it shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars. Any civil penalty assessed and unpaid shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in a proper form of action in the name of the state in the district court of the county in which the violator resides or owns property. The department may also collect in such action attorney's fees and costs incurred in the collection of the civil penalty. The department shall, within thirty days from receipt, remit any collected civil penalty to the State Treasurer to be disposed of in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-155.03;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 98.